lexc/verb/enhuigeik.lexc
LEXICON Nrepill
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§igea§n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§igea§n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§igea§ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§igea§n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§igea§n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^§igea§ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  Potill;
                     Potill2;
LEXICON Nrepill2
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  Potill;
                     Potill2;

LEXICON Nrep1ill
+Rep:^+cNrep^§igea§g§AA§t  Potill;
                     Pot1ill;

LEXICON Potill
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§igea§n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§igea§n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§igea§ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§igea§n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§igea§n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^§igea§ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfill;
                     Case;
LEXICON Potill2
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfill;
                     Case;

LEXICON Pot1ill
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfill;
                     Case1ill;
LEXICON AddInfill
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§igea§n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§igea§n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§igea§ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§igea§n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§igea§n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^§igea§ni  #;
               Case;

! uses standard Case 

LEXICON Case1ill
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k     #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelol§  #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^ik          #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk    #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§igea§t§igeo2§k   #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^§igea§n§igea§k    #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m         #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d         #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeu§k      #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj§§igea§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§§igeaa§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§§igeo§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj§§igeu§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj§§igea§t§igeo§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj§§igea§n§igea§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igea§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§§igea§d         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj§§igea§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj§§igeu§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj§§igeaa§t§igeo§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeaa§k            #;
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^§igea§tt§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^§igea§tt§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igea§tt     #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^§igea§tt§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^§igea§tt§igea§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^§igea§tt§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^§igea§tt§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^§igea§tt§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^§igea§tt§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^§igea§tt§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^§igea§tt§igeaa§t§igeo2§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^§igea§tt§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^§igea§nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg1^§igea§n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg1^§igea§n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§igea§n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§igea§n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^§igea§n§igeaa§t§igeo§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^§igea§n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^§igea§n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg1^§igea§n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg1^§igea§n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^§igea§n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^§igea§n§igeaa§t§igeo§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^§igea§n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igea§l§igea§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^§igea§tt§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^§igea§n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né


LEXICON AddVerbemleksz
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Caseemleksz;

LEXICON Caseemleksz
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelol§ #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^ik           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§igea§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^§igea§n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§sj§§igeu§k       #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák


LEXICON AddVerbeek
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0 Caseeek;

LEXICON Caseeek
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§ék     #; !igyék, egyék, izzék



LEXICON AddVerbillenioek
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0 Caseillenioek;

LEXICON Caseillenioek
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^eniök #; !illeniök

LEXICON AddVerbtelnioek
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0 Casetelnioek;

LEXICON Casetelnioek
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^niök #; !telniök

LEXICON AddVerblatsz
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Replatsz;

LEXICON Replatsz
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§igea§n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§igea§n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§igea§ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§igea§n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§igea§n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^§igea§ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§igeo§g§AA§t  Imperlatsz;
                    Imper1latsz;

LEXICON Imperlatsz
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nreplatsz;
                      Nrep2latsz;

LEXICON Imper1latsz
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt§§AA§t  Nreplatsz;
                      Nrep1latsz;

LEXICON Nreplatsz
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  Potlatsz;
                     Pot2latsz;
LEXICON Nrep2latsz
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  Potlatsz;
                     Pot2latsz;

LEXICON Nrep1latsz
+Rep:^+cNrep^§igeo§g§AA§t  Potlatsz;
                     Pot1latsz;

LEXICON Potlatsz
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInflatsz;
                     Caselatsz;
LEXICON Pot2latsz
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInflatsz;
                     Caselatsz;

LEXICON Pot1latsz
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInflatsz;
                     Case1latsz;

LEXICON Verb
emlékszik:emléksz AddVerbemleksz;
illik:ill AddVerbillenioek;
látszik:látsz AddVerblatsz;
múlik:múl AddVerblatsz;
telik:tel AddVerbtelnioek;
utazik:utaz AddVerbeek;
